Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE D. DENTISTRY

CHAPTER 267. LICENSING OF FACULTY MEMBERS OF DENTAL OR DENTAL HYGIENE SCHOOLS

Sec. 267.001. LICENSE REQUIRED. (a) A person may not serve as a faculty member of a dental school unless the person holds a dental school faculty member license issued under this chapter.

(b) A person may not serve as a faculty member of a dental hygiene school unless the person holds a dental school faculty member license or dental hygiene school faculty member license issued under this chapter.

(c) This section does not apply to a person who does not have direct patient contact.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 26, eff. March 1, 2004.

Sec. 267.002. EXEMPTIONS. (a) A person is exempt from the requirements of Section 267.001(a) if the person is licensed to practice dentistry in this state.

(b) A person is exempt from the requirements of Section 267.001(b) if the person is licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in this state.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 267.003. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSE. (a) To qualify for a dental school faculty member license, a person must:

(1) file an application with the board that presents proof that the applicant holds:

(A) a degree from a dental school; and

(B) a full-time or part-time salaried faculty position at a dental school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association;

(2) submit an endorsement of the application from the dean, department chair, or program director of the school described by Subdivision (1)(B);

(3) pay the application fee set by the board; and

(4) pass an examination covering jurisprudence administered by the board or by a testing service under an agreement with the board.

(b) To qualify for a dental hygiene school faculty member license, a person must:

(1) file an application with the board that presents proof that the applicant holds:

(A) a degree from a dental hygiene school; and

(B) a full-time or part-time salaried faculty position at a dental hygiene school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association;

(2) submit an endorsement of the application from the dean, department chair, or program director of the school described by Subdivision (1)(B);

(3) pay the application fee set by the board; and

(4) pass an examination covering jurisprudence administered by the board.

(c) An applicant for a license under this chapter must:

(1) file an application for the license not later than the 30th day after the date the person begins employment with the dental or dental hygiene school; and

(2) pass the examination not later than the sixth month after the date the person begins employment with the school.

(d) The board shall set the application fee in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of administering this chapter.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 267.001, an applicant may have direct patient contact before the applicant passes the examination.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 267.004. LICENSE RENEWAL. A license issued under this chapter must be renewed annually.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 267.005. LICENSE EXPIRATION. (a) A license issued under this chapter expires on the termination of the license holder's employment with the dental or dental hygiene school.

(b) A license holder whose employment with a dental or dental hygiene school terminates and who is subsequently employed by the same or a different dental or dental hygiene school must comply with the requirements for obtaining an original license, except that the person is not required to retake the examination.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 267.006. PRACTICE OF DENTISTRY OR DENTAL HYGIENE PROHIBITED. A license issued under this chapter does not authorize the license holder to engage in the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.